Utah statutes.
63H-1-303.   Term of board members.
(1)  The term of board members is four years, except that the term of the
members of the initial board shall be staggered so that the term of
approximately half the board members expires every two years.
(2)  Each board member shall serve until a successor is duly appointed and
qualified.
